Hawaii, session 2026, HB1641.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 291C, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to part XIII to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§291C-     High-speed electric device; lease; rent; sales; operation; prohibited. (a)  No person shall offer for lease or rent a high-speed electric device. (b)  No person shall sell or offer for sale a high-speed electric device, unless the person complies with all applicable regulatory requirements pursuant to this chapter. (c)  No person shall operate a high-speed electric device upon any bicycle lane, highway, roadway, sidewalk, or street. (d) Any person who violates this section shall be subject to a fine of no less than $250 and no more than $1,000 for each violation.  Each violation of this section shall constitute a separate offense. (e)  For purposes of this section, "high-speed electric device" means any device with a motor exceeding seven hundred fifty watts and capable of speeds over twenty-eight miles per hour.  "High-speed electric device" does not include: (1)  A moped or motor vehicle that is registered as required by law to operate on public roadways; or (2)  A motor vehicle that is specifically exempted from registration in section 286-41." SECTION 2.  This Act does not affect rights and duties that matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were begun before its effective date. SECTION 3.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 3000.